src/fst/morphology/affixes/numerals.lexc
LEXICON NUBBEOVCCATLOHKAI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:e#ovccát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:e#ovccát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e%>X4#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#ovccát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#ovccát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#ovccát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e%>X4#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:e#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:e#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:e#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:i%>X5jn#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:i%>n#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>X4#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e%>X4#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#ovccát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e%>X4#ovccát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:e#ovccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#ovccát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#ovccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:e#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:e#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:e#ovccát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#ovccát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:e#ovccát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:e#ovccát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:i%>X4t#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:i%>X5jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:i%>X5jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:i%>X5jn#ovccát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#ovccát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#ovccát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>X4t#ovccát#logi%>n K ;


LEXICON NUBBELOGATLOHKAI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:e#logát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:e#logát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e%>X4#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#logát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#logát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#logát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e%>X4#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:e#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:e#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:e#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:i%>X5jn#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:i%>n#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>X4#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e%>X4#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#logát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e%>X4#logát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:e#logát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#logát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:e#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:e#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:e#logát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:e#logát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:e#logát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:i%>X4t#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:i%>X5jd#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:i%>X5jd#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:i%>X5jn#logát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#logát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:i%>X5jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:i%>X5jd#logát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>X4t#logát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON NUBBELOGI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:e#lohki K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>n#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:i%>n#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:e%>X4#logi K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:e%>X4#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:e%>X4#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e%>X4#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:e#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:e#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:e#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:e#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:i%>X5jn#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:i%>n#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e%>X4#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e%>X4#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:e#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:e%>X4#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e%>X4#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:i%>X4t#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:e%>X4#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:i%>X5jd9#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:i%>X5jd9#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:i%>X5jde#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:i%>X5jd9#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:i%>X5jgujn#logi%>jgujn K ;




LEXICON GOLBMA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Case forms of the basic digits
 +Num+Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc: K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4 NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X3j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd RHyph ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>X5jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>X5jgujn K ;

LEXICON BEALGOLBMA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Case forms of the basic digits, only sg
 +Num+Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc: K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X3j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn K ;


LEXICON NOLLA   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Case forms of nolla/nulla, as GOLBMA, but only Sg, no Cmp
 +Num+Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc: K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4 K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X3j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn K ;


LEXICON GOLBMANUPPELOHKAI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:#nuppe#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:#nuppe#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#nuppe#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#nuppe#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#nuppe#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:%>n#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:%>X5jn#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#nuppe#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:#nuppe#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#nuppe#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#nuppe#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:#nuppe#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#nuppe#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:#nuppe#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:#nuppe#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:%>X5jd#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:%>X5jd#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jn#nuppe#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#nuppe#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#nuppe#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#nuppe#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON GOLBMAGOALMMATLOHKAI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:#goalmmát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#goalmmát#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#goalmmát#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#goalmmát#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:%>n#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:%>X5jn#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#goalmmát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#goalmmát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#goalmmát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:#goalmmát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:#goalmmát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:#goalmmát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:%>X5jd#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:%>X5jd#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jn#goalmmát#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#goalmmát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#goalmmát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#goalmmát#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON GOLBMANJEALJATLOHKAI   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 +Num+Sg+Nom:#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:#njealját#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:#njealját#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#njealját#logi K ;
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#njealját#logi NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Cmp/SgGen:%>X4#njealját#lot NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:%>n#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:%>X5jn#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Ess+Attr:#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#njealját#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X4#njealját#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:#njealját#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:#njealját#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:#njealját#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:%>X5jd#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:%>X5jd#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jn#njealját#lot K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#njealját#logi%>n K ;
